test/src/morphology/adv-roots_gt-norm.yaml
# yaml test generated from src/morphology/stems/adv.lexc with doccomments2yaml.awk
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst

Tests:
  ADV: #
    aakkosellisesti+Adv+Foc/kin: aakkosellisestikin # 
    aakkosellisesti+Adv: aakkosellisesti # 
    mukaan+Adv+PxSg1: mukaani # 
    mukaan+Adv+PxPl1: mukaamme # 
    ajassa+Adv: ajassa # 
    ajassa+Adv+Qst: ajassako # 
